Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.130

"Sexually explicit material"—Defined—Unlawful display.

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful display of sexually explicit material if he or she knowingly exhibits such material on a viewing screen so that the sexually explicit material is easily visible from a public thoroughfare, park or playground or from one or more family dwelling units.

(2) "Sexually explicit material" as that term is used in this section means any pictorial material displaying direct physical stimulation of unclothed genitals, masturbation, sodomy (i.e. bestiality or oral or anal intercourse), flagellation or torture in the context of a sexual relationship, or emphasizing the depiction of adult human genitals: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That works of art or of anthropological significance shall not be deemed to be within the foregoing definition.

(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 322; 1975 1st ex.s. c 156 s 1.]